Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-821
District court of Lancaster County; jurisdiction; appeal.

The district court of Lancaster County shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of all legal proceedings, except criminal actions, related to the administration, enforcement, or fulfillment of the responsibilities, duties, or functions of the division. An aggrieved party seeking review of an order or decision of the Tax Commissioner shall file an appeal with the district court of Lancaster County within thirty days after the date of such order or decision. All such proceedings shall be considered contested cases pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 21;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 41.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.